dictionaries/ru_RU/ru_RU_oo3.aff
SFX Y Y 435
SFX Y   ЮШ   ЦЕЫШ         ЮШ
SFX Y   ЮШ   ЦЕФЕ         ЮШ
SFX Y   ЮШ   ЦЕФ          ЮШ
SFX Y   ЮШ   ЦЕН          ЮШ
SFX Y   ЮШ   ЗХФ          ЮШ
SFX Y   ЮШ   ЗХ           ЮШ
SFX Y   ЪБФШУС ЦХФУС        ЪБФШУС
SFX Y   ЪБФШУС ЦХУШ         ЪБФШУС
SFX Y   ЪБФШУС ЦЕЫШУС       ЪБФШУС
SFX Y   ЪБФШУС ЦЕФУС        ЪБФШУС
SFX Y   ЪБФШУС ЦЕФЕУШ       ЪБФШУС
SFX Y   ЪБФШУС ЦЕНУС        ЪБФШУС
SFX Y   ЪБФШ ЦХФ          ЪБФШ
SFX Y   ЪБФШ ЦХ           ЪБФШ
SFX Y   ЪБФШ ЦЕЫШ         ЪБФШ
SFX Y   ЪБФШ ЦЕФЕ         ЪБФШ
SFX Y   ЪБФШ ЦЕФ          ЪБФШ
SFX Y   ЪБФШ ЦЕН          ЪБФШ
SFX Y   ЩФШУС ХДХФУС       ВЩФШУС
SFX Y   ЩФШУС ХДХУШ        ВЩФШУС
SFX Y   ЩФШУС ХДЕЫШУС      ВЩФШУС
SFX Y   ЩФШУС ХДЕФУС       ВЩФШУС
SFX Y   ЩФШУС ХДЕФЕУШ      ВЩФШУС
SFX Y   ЩФШУС ХДЕНУС       ВЩФШУС
SFX Y   ЩФШ  ХДХФ         ВЩФШ
SFX Y   ЩФШ  ХДХ          ВЩФШ
SFX Y   ЩФШ  ХДЕЫШ        ВЩФШ
SFX Y   ЩФШ  ХДЕФЕ        ВЩФШ
SFX Y   ЩФШ  ХДЕФ         ВЩФШ
SFX Y   ЩФШ  ХДЕН         ВЩФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧХФУС       ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧХУШ        ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЕЫШУС      ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЕФУС       ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЕФЕУШ      ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЕНУС       ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЈЫШУС      ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЈФУС       ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЈФЕУШ      ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШУС ПЧЈНУС       ЪЧБФШУС
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧХФ         ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧХ          ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЕЫШ        ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЕФЕ        ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЕФ         ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЕН         ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЈЫШ        ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЈФЕ        ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЈФ         ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЧБФШ ПЧЈН         ЪЧБФШ
SFX Y   ЦБФШУС ЗХФУС        ЦБФШУС
SFX Y   ЦБФШУС ЗХУШ         ЦБФШУС
SFX Y   ЦБФШ ЗХФ          ЦБФШ
SFX Y   ЦБФШ ЗХ           ЦБФШ
SFX Y   ФШУС ЫШУС         ДБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧХФУС        МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧХУШ         МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЕЫШУС       МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЕФУС        МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЕФЕУШ       МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЕНУС        МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЈЫШУС       МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЈФУС        МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЈФЕУШ       МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ЧЈНУС        МЩФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС УФУС         ДБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ОХФУС        УФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ОХУШ         УФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ОЕЫШУС       УФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ОЕФУС        УФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ОЕФЕУШ       УФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ОЕНУС        УФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС НУС          ДБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ДХФУС        ДБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ДЙФЕУШ       ДБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШУС ДЙНУС        ДБФШУС
SFX Y   ФШ   ЫШ           ДБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧХФ          МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧХ           МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЕЫШ         МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЕФЕ         МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЕФ          МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЕН          МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЈЫШ         МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЈФЕ         МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЈФ          МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЧЈН          МЩФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ХФ           МЕЪФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   Х            МЕЪФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   УФ           ДБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ОХФ          УФБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ОХ           УФБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ОЕЫШ         УФБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ОЕФЕ         УФБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ОЕФ          УФБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ОЕН          УФБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   Н            ДБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЕЫШ          МЕЪФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЕФЕ          МЕЪФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЕФ           МЕЪФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ЕН           МЕЪФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ДХФ          ДБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ДЙФЕ         ДБФШ
SFX Y   ФШ   ДЙН          ДБФШ
SFX Y   ФБФШУС ЮХФУС        [^У]ФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФБФШУС ЮХУШ         [^У]ФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФБФШУС ЮЕЫШУС       [^У]ФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФБФШУС ЮЕФУС        [^У]ФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФБФШУС ЮЕФЕУШ       [^У]ФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФБФШУС ЮЕНУС        [^У]ФБФШУС
SFX Y   ФБФШ ЮХФ          [^У]ФБФШ
SFX Y   ФБФШ ЮХ           [^У]ФБФШ
SFX Y   ФБФШ ЮЕЫШ         [^У]ФБФШ
SFX Y   ФБФШ ЮЕФЕ         [^У]ФБФШ
SFX Y   ФБФШ ЮЕФ          [^У]ФБФШ
SFX Y   ФБФШ ЮЕН          [^У]ФБФШ
SFX Y   УФШУС ДХФУС        БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДХУШ         БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЕЫШУС       БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЕФУС        БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЕФЕУШ       БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЕНУС        БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЈЫШУС       БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЈФУС        БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЈФЕУШ       БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШУС ДЈНУС        БУФШУС
SFX Y   УФШ  ДХФ          БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДХ           БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЕЫШ         БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЕФЕ         БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЕФ          БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЕН          БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЈЫШ         БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЈФЕ         БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЈФ          БУФШ
SFX Y   УФШ  ДЈН          БУФШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФХФУС        МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФХУШ         МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЕЫШУС       МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЕФУС        МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЕФЕУШ       МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЕНУС        МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЈЫШУС       МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЈФУС        МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЈФЕУШ       МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ФЈНУС        МЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДХФУС        ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДХУШ         ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЕЫШУС       ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЕФУС        ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЕФЕУШ       ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЕНУС        ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЈЫШУС       ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЈФУС        ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЈФЕУШ       ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙУШ ДЈНУС        ЧЕУФЙУШ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФХФ          МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФХ           МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЕЫШ         МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЕФЕ         МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЕФ          МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЕН          МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЈЫШ         МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЈФЕ         МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЈФ          МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ФЈН          МЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДХФ          ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДХ           ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЕЫШ         ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЕФЕ         ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЕФ          ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЕН          ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЈЫШ         ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЈФЕ         ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЈФ          ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ДЈН          ЧЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВХФ          ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВХ           ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЕЫШ         ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЕФЕ         ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЕФ          ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЕН          ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЈЫШ         ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЈФЕ         ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЈФ          ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УФЙ  ВЈН          ТЕУФЙ
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЕЫШУС      УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЕФУС       УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЕФЕУШ      УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЕНУС       УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМАФУС       УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМАУШ        УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЈЫШУС      УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЈФУС       УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЈФЕУШ      УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШУС ЫМЈНУС       УМБФШУС
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЕЫШ        УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЕФЕ        УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЕФ         УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЕН         УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМАФ         УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМА          УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЈЫШ        УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЈФЕ        УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЈФ         УМБФШ
SFX Y   УМБФШ ЫМЈН         УМБФШ
SFX Y   УЛБФШУС ЭХФУС        УЛБФШУС
SFX Y   УЛБФШУС ЭХУШ         УЛБФШУС
SFX Y   УЛБФШУС ЭЕЫШУС       УЛБФШУС
SFX Y   УЛБФШУС ЭЕФУС        УЛБФШУС
SFX Y   УЛБФШУС ЭЕФЕУШ       УЛБФШУС
SFX Y   УЛБФШУС ЭЕНУС        УЛБФШУС
SFX Y   УЛБФШ ЭХФ          УЛБФШ
SFX Y   УЛБФШ ЭХ           УЛБФШ
SFX Y   УЛБФШ ЭЕЫШ         УЛБФШ
SFX Y   УЛБФШ ЭЕФЕ         УЛБФШ
SFX Y   УЛБФШ ЭЕФ          УЛБФШ
SFX Y   УЛБФШ ЭЕН          УЛБФШ
SFX Y   УЕФШ ЫХ           УЕФШ
SFX Y   УБФШУС ЫХФУС        [^П]УБФШУС
SFX Y   УБФШУС ЫХУШ         [^П]УБФШУС
SFX Y   УБФШУС ЫЕЫШУС       [^П]УБФШУС
SFX Y   УБФШУС ЫЕФУС        [^П]УБФШУС
SFX Y   УБФШУС ЫЕФЕУШ       [^П]УБФШУС
SFX Y   УБФШУС ЫЕНУС        [^П]УБФШУС
SFX Y   УБФШ ЫХФ          [^П]УБФШ
SFX Y   УБФШ ЫХ           [^П]УБФШ
SFX Y   УБФШ ЫЕЫШ         [^П]УБФШ
SFX Y   УБФШ ЫЕФЕ         [^П]УБФШ
SFX Y   УБФШ ЫЕФ          [^П]УБФШ
SFX Y   УБФШ ЫЕН          [^П]УБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТХФУС        [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТХУШ         [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЕЫШУС       [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЕФУС        [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЕФЕУШ       [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЕНУС        [^ВД]ТБФШУС
